Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1501
Interference or refusal to comply with Secretary of State; penalty.

Any person who willfully interferes with or refuses to comply with the requirements of and cooperate with the Secretary of State or his or her designated agent in carrying out the powers and duties prescribed in sections 32-202 and 32-203 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 400.